apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_np.en.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="iso-8859-1"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="comp"/>
    <sdef n="detnt"/>
    <sdef n="predet"/>
    <sdef n="atn"/>
    <sdef n="qnt"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="obj"/>
    <sdef n="subj"/>
    <sdef n="pro"/>
    <sdef n="tn"/>
    <sdef n="acr"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
    <sdef n="ant"/>
    <sdef n="al"/>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="np"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="f"/>
    <sdef n="m"/>
    <sdef n="mf"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"/>
    <sdef n="pr"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="nn"/>
    <sdef n="an"/>
    <sdef n="aa"/>
    <sdef n="ind"/>
    <sdef n="itg"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"/>
    <sdef n="nt"/>
    <sdef n="vaux"/>
    <sdef n="vbser"/>
    <sdef n="vbhaver"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="pp"/>
    <sdef n="pri"/>
    <sdef n="ifi"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="pii"/>
    <sdef n="fti"/>
    <sdef n="cni"/>
    <sdef n="prs"/>
    <sdef n="pis"/>
    <sdef n="imp"/>
    <sdef n="pos"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="sp"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="ij"/>
    <sdef n="sent"/>
    <sdef n="cm"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"/>
    <sdef n="lquest"/>
    <sdef n="web"/>
    <sdef n="guio"/>
  </sdefs>


 <pardefs>

<!--Paradigmes de números i signes puntuació -->

<pardef n="guionet">
    
      <e>
        <p>
	  <l>-</l>
          <r>-<s n="guio"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="coma">
    
      <e>
        <p>
         <l>,</l>
         <r>,<s n="cm"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
    
      <e>
        <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="num"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
    
      <e>
        <re>[.\?;:!]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="sent"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

     <pardef n="separ">
    
      <e>
        <re>[¿¡]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lquest"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\(\[]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
    
      <e>
        <re>[\)\]]</re>
        <p>
          <l/>
         <r><s n="rpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="Barcelona__np">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="United_States__np">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="Mark__np">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
 <pardef n="Mary__np">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

<e lm="Alhucemas"><i>Alhucemas</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Anguilla"><i>Anguilla</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Arkansas"><i>Arkansas</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Azerbaijan"><i>Azerbaijan</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Balearic Islands"><i>Balearic<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bangui"><i>Bangui</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Benin"><i>Benin</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bolivia"><i>Bolivia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="British Isles"><i>British<b/>Isles</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="Brussels"><i>Brussels</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cairo"><i>Cairo</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Canary Islands"><i>Canary<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="Catalonia"><i>Catalonia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cayman Islands"><i>Cayman Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="Channel Islands"><i>Channel<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cologne"><i>Cologne</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cook Islands"><i>Cook<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="Croatia"><i>Croatia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Djibouti"><i>Djibouti</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Enderbury"><i>Enderbury</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="European Union"><i>European<b/>Union</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Falkland Islands"><i>Falkland<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="Gabon"><i>Gabon</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Galapagos Islands"><i>Galapagos<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="Great Britain"><i>Great<b/>Britain</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Guyana"><i>Guyana</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Helsinki"><i>Helsinki</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Indiana"><i>Indiana</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Israel"><i>Israel</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jupiter"><i>Jupiter</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Khartoum"><i>Khartoum</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Latvia"><i>Latvia</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lithuania"><i>Lithuania</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Madrid"><i>Madrid</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Manila"><i>Manila</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marshall Islands"><i>Marshall<b/>Islands</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="Melilla"><i>Melilla</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Monaco"><i>Monaco</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Moscow"><i>Moscow</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Netherlands"><i>Netherlands</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="NetherlandsAntilles"><i>Netherlands<b/>Antilles</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nibelung"><i>Nibelung</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="North Pole"><i>North<b/>Pole</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Oslo"><i>Oslo</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Paris"><i>Paris</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Portugal"><i>Portugal</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Samoa"><i>Samoa</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="South America"><i>South<b/>America</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="The Netherlands"><i>The<b/>Netherlands</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="United Arab Emirates"><i>United<b/>Arab<b/>Emirates</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="United States"><i>United<b/>States</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="United States of America"><i>United<b/>States<b/>of<b/>America</i><par n="United_States__np"/></e>
<e lm="Venus"><i>Venus</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ainara"><i>Ainara</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Aitor"><i>Aitor</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alexandra"><i>Alexandra</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alex"><i>Alex</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Alyne"><i>Alyne</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Andrea"><i>Andrea</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Àngel"><i>Àngel</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Anna"><i>Anna</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Antònia"><i>Antònia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Arnald"><i>Arnald</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Aroa"><i>Aroa</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="(Barnard)"><i>(Barnard)</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Baterich"><i>Baterich</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Benedict"><i>Benedict</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bennet"><i>Bennet</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Borja"><i>Borja</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Candela "><i>Candela </i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Carolina "><i>Carolina </i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cecil"><i>Cecil</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Christopher"><i>Christopher</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Cicely"><i>Cicely</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Collys"><i>Collys</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Daniela"><i>Daniela</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Daniel"><i>Daniel</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dionisia"><i>Dionisia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Edith"><i>Edith</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Edmond"><i>Edmond</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Elizabeth"><i>Elizabeth</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Elynor"><i>Elynor</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Enric"><i>Enric</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Esperaunce"><i>Esperaunce</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Esther"><i>Esther</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Felice"><i>Felice</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Fernando"><i>Fernando</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Frances"><i>Frances</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Francis"><i>Francis</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Geoffrey"><i>Geoffrey</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Giles"><i>Giles</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Grace"><i>Grace</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Guy"><i>Guy</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Henry"><i>Henry</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hugo"><i>Hugo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Inès"><i>Inès</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ingham"><i>Ingham</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Isabelle"><i>Isabelle</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ivo"><i>Ivo</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jaume"><i>Jaume</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jeanne"><i>Jeanne</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Joan Antoni"><i>Joan Antoni</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Joel"><i>Joel</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Jorge"><i>Jorge</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Judit"><i>Judit</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kateryn"><i>Kateryn</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Laurence"><i>Laurence</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Llorenç"><i>Llorenç</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Llúcia"><i>Llúcia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Luke"><i>Luke</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Margalida"><i>Margalida</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Maria del Mar"><i>Maria del Mar</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Marion"><i>Marion</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Martí"><i>Martí</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Maurice"><i>Maurice</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Mildred"><i>Mildred</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Morys"><i>Morys</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Neus"><i>Neus</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nichol"><i>Nichol</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Oliver"><i>Oliver</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Owner"><i>Owner</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pere"><i>Pere</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Raffe"><i>Raffe</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Raulin"><i>Raulin</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Roger"><i>Roger</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Rose"><i>Rose</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sílvia"><i>Sílvia</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Simon"><i>Simon</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tània"><i>Tània</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
<e lm="Tomàs"><i>Tomàs</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Xavier"><i>Xavier</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
<e lm="Yaiza"><i>Yaiza</i><par n="Mary__np"/></e>
      <e>
        <par n="separa"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="numeros"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="coma"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="paresq"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="pardret"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="separ"/>
      </e>
   <e>
        <par n="guionet"/>
      </e>
